District of Columbia statutes.
28:9-527

Duty to report.

The Mayor shall report annually on or before April 1 to the Council on the operation of the filing office. The report must contain a statement of the extent to which:

(1)

The filing-office rules are not in harmony with the rules of filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this part and the reasons for these variations; and

(2)

The filing-office rules are not in harmony with the most recent version of the Model Rules promulgated by the International Association of Corporate Administrators, or any successor organization, and the reasons for these variations.

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-201, § 101, 47 DCR 7576

History

1. Source. New; derived in part from the Uniform Consumer Credit Code (1974).

2. Duty to Report. This section is designed to promote compliance with the standards of performance imposed upon the filing office and with the requirement that the filing office’s policies, practices, and technology be consistent and compatible with the policies, practices, and technology of other filing offices.

Uniform Commercial Code Comment